Idaho, session 2025, H0471.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 40-1404A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
40-1404A. ELECTIONS, TERMS AND SALARIES OF COMMISSIONERS IN CERTAIN
COUNTYWIDE HIGHWAY DISTRICTS. (1) In countywide highway districts located
in a county with a population of more than two hundred thousand (200,000)
persons in which the voters have chosen to establish a countywide highway
district at a previous election, the county shall be divided by the county
commissioners immediately upon the effective date of this act into five (5)
subdistricts which shall be as nearly equal in population as practicable.
No precincts shall be divided. A highway district commissioner shall be a
resident of the subdistrict which he represents. Voters in each subdistrict
shall vote only for one (1) candidate seeking to represent that each subdis-
trict. County commissioners, mayors and city council members shall not be
eligible to hold office as a countywide highway district commissioner. At
the election held in 1998, commissioners representing subdistricts two and
five shall be elected for two (2) year terms and commissioners representing
subdistricts three and four shall be elected for four (4) year terms. There-
after, all commissioners shall be elected for four (4) year terms. Any in-
cumbent in office on the effective date of this act may complete the term to
which they were elected and shall represent the subdistrict in which they re-
side. Any incumbent in office on the effective date of this act whose term


expires on January 1, 2000, shall retain that office until January 1, 2000,
shall be assigned the subdistrict in which they reside by the county commis-
sioners, which subdistrict shall be numbered one as provided in this section
and that commissioner need not stand for election in 1998.
(2) A qualified voter of the countywide highway district shall be eli-
gible to vote for a each of the countywide highway district commissioner re-
siding in the elector's subdistrict commissioners, and the election shall
be conducted as provided by Idaho statutes relating to holding general elec-
tions at the county level.
(3) Beginning with the elections of 2026, the election of highway dis-
trict commissioners in a highway district subject to the provisions of this
section shall include primary elections pursuant to the provisions of chap-
ter 7, title 34, Idaho Code.
(4) The highway commissioners shall take office on January 1 of the year
immediately following their election, and each may be compensated in accor-
dance with the provisions of section 40-1314, Idaho Code, or receive a salary
not to exceed one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200) per calendar month
with the exception of the president of the highway commissioners who may re-
ceive a salary not to exceed one thousand four hundred dollars ($1,400) per
calendar month.
SECTION 2. That Section 34-702, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-702. REQUIREMENTS FOR WRITE-IN CANDIDATES AT PRIMARY. (1) In addi-
tion to possessing all other qualifications, in order to become a candidate
of a political party at the general election, those candidates whose names
are written in at the primary election must:
(a) Receive at least the following number of write-in votes at the pri-
mary election:
(i) One thousand (1,000) for any statewide office;
(ii) Five hundred (500) for a congressional district office;
(iii) Fifty (50) for a legislative district office; or
(iv) Five (5) for a county office or a single countywide highway
district office pursuant to section 40-1404A, Idaho Code; and
(b) File a declaration of intent for that office, pursuant to section
34-702A, Idaho Code.
(2) Candidates who are required to file with the secretary of state
shall pay the filing fee required for that office no later than the deadline
for filing a declaration of intent pursuant to section 34-702A, Idaho Code,
or shall file a petition pursuant to section 34-626, Idaho Code.
(3) No write-ins shall be allowed for judicial office.
SECTION 3. That Section 34-702A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-702A. DECLARATION OF INTENT FOR WRITE-IN CANDIDATES. (1) No
write-in vote for any office in a primary, special, or general election
shall be counted unless a completed declaration of intent form has been filed
indicating that the person desires the office and is legally qualified to
assume the duties of said office if elected. The declaration of intent shall


be filed with the secretary of state if for a federal, state, or legislative
district office and with the county clerk if for a county office, a single
countywide highway district office pursuant to section 40-1404A, Idaho
Code, or party precinct committeeman office. Such declaration of intent
shall be filed no later than the ninth Friday before the day of election. For
a write-in candidate for president, the declaration shall include a cer-
tification of the write-in candidate's vice presidential and presidential
electors, all of whom must be qualified to serve in their respective offices.
The secretary of state shall prescribe the form for said declarations.
(2) In those counties that utilize optical scan ballots, an elector
shall not place on the ballot a sticker bearing the name of a person or use any
other method or device, except writing, to vote for a person whose name is not
printed on the ballot.
SECTION 4. That Section 34-703, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-703. NOMINATION AT PRIMARY. (1) All political party candidates for
United States senator and representative in congress and all political party
candidates for elective state, district, single countywide highway district
pursuant to section 40-1404A, Idaho Code, and county offices, except can-
didates for judicial office, at general elections shall be nominated at the
primary elections, or shall have their names placed on the general election
ballot as provided by law, and shall comply with the provisions of this act.
(2) All candidates for judicial office shall be nominated or elected at
the primary election, as provided by section 34-1217, Idaho Code.
(3) Independent candidates shall not be voted on at primary elections.
SECTION 5. That Section 34-704, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-704. DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY. (1) Any person legally qualified to
hold such office is entitled to become a candidate and file his declaration
of candidacy. Each political party candidate for precinct, state, district,
single countywide highway district pursuant to section 40-1404A, Idaho
Code, or county office shall file his declaration of candidacy in the proper
office between 8:00 a.m. on the twelfth Monday preceding the primary elec-
tion and 5:00 p.m. on the tenth Friday preceding the primary election. All
political party candidates shall declare their party affiliation in their
declaration of candidacy and shall be affiliated with a party at the time of
filing. A candidate shall be deemed affiliated with the political party if
the candidate submits a party affiliation form along with the declaration
of candidacy to the filing official. The filing official shall reject any
declaration of candidacy for partisan office in a primary election from can-
didates who are not affiliated with a political party. Candidates for non-
partisan office shall file during the period provided for in this section.
(2) Candidates who file a declaration of candidacy under a party name
and are not nominated at the primary election shall not be allowed to appear
on the general election ballot under any other political party name, nor as
an independent candidate.


(3) Independent candidates shall file their declaration of candidacy
in the manner provided in section 34-708, Idaho Code.
(4) All information in declarations of candidacy shall be made publicly
available upon request, except that the Idaho residential street address and
telephone number of a judicial officer may be exempt from disclosure pur-
suant to sections 19-6202 and 74-106(30), Idaho Code.
SECTION 6. That Section 34-705, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-705. WITH WHOM DECLARATIONS FILED. (1) All candidates for county
offices, whether political party candidates or independent candidates,
and all political party candidates for single countywide highway district
pursuant to section 40-1404A, Idaho Code, or precinct offices shall file
their declarations of candidacy with the county clerk of their respective
counties. All candidates for district, state and federal offices shall file
their declarations of candidacy with the secretary of state.
(2) The secretary of state shall certify to the county clerks, within
ten (10) days after the filing deadline, the names of the political party
candidates who filed for federal, state and district offices and are qual-
ified for placement on the ballot.
(3) The secretary of state shall certify the name of a candidate being
appointed by the appropriate central committee pursuant to section 34-714,
Idaho Code, by no later than the next business day after the appointment is
received in the secretary of state's office, if received after the certifi-
cation of candidates to the county clerks under subsection (2) of this sec-
tion.
SECTION 7. That Section 34-706, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-706. NOTIFICATION TO PARTIES. Within three (3) days after the dead-
line for filing declarations of political party candidacy the county clerk
shall notify the county central committee of each political party of the can-
didates who have filed for county offices, single countywide highway dis-
trict offices pursuant to section 40-1404A, Idaho Code, and precinct offices
under the party name and are qualified.
Within three (3) days after the deadline for filing declarations of po-
litical party candidacy the secretary of state shall notify the legislative
district central committee of each political party of the legislative candi-
dates who have filed under the party name and are qualified.
Within three (3) days after the deadline for filing declarations of po-
litical party candidacy the secretary of state shall notify the state cen-
tral committee of each political party of the candidates who have filed for
federal and state offices under the party name and are qualified.
SECTION 8. That Section 34-708, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-708. INDEPENDENT CANDIDATES. (1) No person may offer himself as an
independent candidate at the primary election.


(2) Any person who desires to offer himself as an independent candi-
date for federal, state, district, single countywide highway district pur-
suant to section 40-1404A, Idaho Code, or county office may do so by com-
plying strictly with the provisions of this section. In order to be recog-
nized as an independent candidate, each such candidate must file with the
proper officer as provided by section 34-705, Idaho Code, a declaration of
candidacy as an independent candidate, during the period specified in sec-
tion 34-704, Idaho Code. Such declaration must state that he is offering
himself as an independent candidate, must declare that he has no political
party affiliation, and must declare the office for which he seeks election.
Each such declaration must be accompanied by a petition containing the fol-
lowing number of signatures of qualified electors:
(a) One thousand (1,000) for any statewide office;
(b) Five hundred (500) for any congressional district office;
(c) Fifty (50) for any legislative district office;
(d) Five (5) for any county office.
(3) Signatures on the petitions required in this section shall be veri-
fied in the manner prescribed in section 34-1807, Idaho Code, on a form simi-
lar to that used for recall petitions under chapter 17, title 34, Idaho Code,
as prescribed by the secretary of state.
(4) If all of the requirements of this section have been met, the proper
officer shall cause the name of each independent candidate who has qualified
to be placed on the general election ballot, according to instructions of the
secretary of state.
SECTION 9. That Section 34-712, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-712. SAMPLE FORM FOR PRIMARY ELECTION BALLOTS. The secretary of
state shall provide the sample form of the primary election ballot to each
of the county clerks no later than forty (40) days prior to the primary. The
sample ballot shall contain the proper political party candidates to be
voted upon within the county whose declarations were filed and certified in
the office of the secretary of state with instructions for the placing of po-
litical party candidates seeking the political party nomination for county
offices, single countywide highway district offices pursuant to section
40-1404A, Idaho Code, and precinct offices. If a county is within more than
one (1) legislative district, the secretary of state shall provide a sample
ballot for each legislative district which includes part of the county.
SECTION 10. That Section 34-714, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-714. FILLING VACANCIES IN SLATE OF POLITICAL PARTY CANDIDATES OC-
CURRING PRIOR TO PRIMARY ELECTION. (1) Vacancies that occur before the pri-
mary election in the slate of candidates of any political party because of
the death, disqualification for any reason, or withdrawal from the nomina-
tion process by the candidate, shall be filled in the following manner if
only one (1) candidate declared for that particular office:


(a) By the county central committee if the vacancy occurs for the of-
fice of precinct committeeman, single countywide highway district of-
fice pursuant to section 40-1404A, Idaho Code, or for a county office.
(b) By the legislative district central committee if the vacancy occurs
for the office of state representative or state senator.
(c) By the state central committee if the vacancy occurs for a federal
or state office.
The county and legislative district central committee shall fill the
vacancy within fifteen (15) days from the date the vacancy occurred. The
state central committee shall fill the vacancy within thirty (30) days from
the date the vacancy occurred.
Any political party candidate so appointed by the proper central com-
mittee must, in order to have his name on the primary ballot, file a declara-
tion of candidacy and pay the required filing fee.
(2) No central committee shall fill any vacancy which occurs within ten
(10) days prior to the primary election. Vacancies which occur during this
ten (10) day period because of the death, disqualification for any reason,
or withdrawal from the nomination process by the candidate shall be filled
according to the provisions of section 34-715, Idaho Code.
(3) Vacancies that occur in a slate of candidates for precinct com-
mitteeman within ten (10) days prior to the primary election shall not be
filled.
SECTION 11. That Section 34-715, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-715. FILLING OF VACANCIES OCCURRING BEFORE OR AFTER PRIMARY ELEC-
TION. Vacancies that occur during the ten (10) day period before a primary
election, or after the primary election but at least ten (10) days before the
general election in the slate of candidates of any political party, except
candidates for precinct committeeman, shall be filled in the following man-
ner:
(1) By the county central committee if it is a vacancy by a candidate
for a county office or single countywide highway district office pursuant to
section 40-1404A, Idaho Code.
(2) By the legislative district central committee if it is a vacancy by
a candidate for the state legislature.
(3) By the state central committee if it is a vacancy by a candidate for
a federal or a state office.
The county and legislative district central committee shall fill the
vacancy within fifteen (15) days from the date the vacancy occurred. The
state central committee shall fill the vacancy within thirty (30) days from
the date the vacancy occurred.
Any political party candidate so appointed by the proper central com-
mittee must, in order to have his name on the general ballot, file a declara-
tion of candidacy and pay the required filing fee.
Vacancies that occur in a slate of candidates for precinct committeeman
within ten (10) days prior to the primary election shall not be filled.


SECTION 12. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.